Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2524
County personnel officer; duties.

In addition to other duties imposed upon him or her by or pursuant to the County Civil Service Act, it shall be the duty of the county personnel officer:

(1) To apply and carry out the act and the rules and regulations adopted thereunder;

(2) To attend meetings of the personnel policy board and to act as its secretary and keep minutes of its proceedings;

(3) To establish and maintain a roster of all employees in the classified service, in which there shall be set forth as to each employee the class title, pay, or status, and other pertinent data;

(4) To appoint such employees of his or her office and such experts and special assistants as may be necessary to carry out effectively the act;

(5) To foster and develop, in cooperation with appointing authorities and others, programs for the improvement of employee effectiveness, including training, safety, health, counseling, and welfare;

(6) To encourage and exercise leadership in the development of effective personnel administration with the several county agencies, departments, and institutions; and

(7) To perform such other lawful acts as he or she may consider necessary or desirable to carry out the purposes and provisions of the County Civil Service Act.

Laws 1974, LB 995, § 8;

Laws 2006, LB 808, § 16.